test/src/morphology/N-taso_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - таˮ: # Noun 'side dish' - full paradigm /Type 35/
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom: таˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc: тасмʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen: тасʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat: татʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc: такана
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl: такад
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros: таˮамна
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom: такʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc: такʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen: такʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom: тасˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc: тасо
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen: тасоˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat: такˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc: такаˮна
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl: такат
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros: тасоˮмана    

     таˮ+N+Tra: таˮ
     таˮ+N+Car: тациˮ
     таˮ+N+Equ: татремʼ
     таˮ+N+Equ+Lat: татревʼ

# Possessive forms 

     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: таˮам
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: таˮал  
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: тата 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: таˮмиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: таˮлиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: татиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: таˮмаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: таˮлаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: татоʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: таˮам    
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: тат  
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: тата 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: таˮмиʼ 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: татиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: татиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: таˮмаˮ 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: татаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: татоʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: таˮам
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: тат  
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: тата 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: таˮниʼ 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: татиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: татиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: таˮнаˮ 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: татаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: татоʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: такан   
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: таканд  
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: таканда 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: таканиʼ 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: такандиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: такандиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: таканаˮ 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: такандаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: такандоʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: таканан   
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: такананд  
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: такананда 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: такананиʼ 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: таканандиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: таканандиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: такананаˮ 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: таканандаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: таканандоʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: такадан   
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: такаданд  
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: такаданда 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: такаданиʼ 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: такадандиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: такадандиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: такаданаˮ 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: такадандаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: такадандоʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: таˮамнан   
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: таˮамнанд  
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: таˮамнанда 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: таˮамнаниʼ 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: таˮамнандиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: таˮамнандиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: таˮамнанаˮ 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: таˮамнандаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: таˮамнандоʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: такаюн  
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: такаюд  
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: такаюда 
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: такаюниʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: такаюдиʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: такаюдиʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: такаюнаˮ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: такаюдаˮ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: такаюдоʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: такаюн  
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: такаюд  
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: такаюда 
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: такаюниʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: такаюдиʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: такаюдиʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: такаюнаˮ
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: такаюдаˮ
     таˮ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: такаюдоʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: такаюн  
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: такают  
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: такаюта 
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: такаюниʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: такаютиʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: такаютиʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: такаюнаˮ
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: такаютаˮ
     таˮ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: такаютоʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: тасон   
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: тасод   
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: тасода  
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: тасониʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: тасодиʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: тасодиʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: тасонаˮ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: тасодаˮ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: тасодоʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: тасон   
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: тасод   
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: тасода  
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: тасониʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: тасодиʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: тасодиʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: тасонаˮ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: тасодаˮ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: тасодоʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: тасоˮн  
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: тасот   
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: тасота  
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: тасоˮниʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: тасотиʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: тасотиʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: тасоˮнаˮ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: тасотаˮ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: тасотоʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: такаˮн 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: такат 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: таката 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: такаˮниʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: такатиʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: такатиʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: такаˮнаˮ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: такатаˮ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: такатоʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: такаˮнан  
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: такаˮнат  
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: такаˮната 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: такаˮнаниʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: такаˮнатиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: такаˮнатиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: такаˮнанаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: такаˮнатаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: такаˮнатоʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: такатан 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: такатат 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: такатата 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: такатаниʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: такататиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: такататиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: такатанаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: такататаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: такататоʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: тасоˮманан  
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: тасоˮманат  
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: тасоˮманата 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: тасоˮмананиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: тасоˮманатиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: тасоˮманатиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: тасоˮмананаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: тасоˮманатаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: тасоˮманатоʼ
     
# Predestinative

     таˮ+N+Pred+Abs: тат
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [татав, татув] 
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: татар  
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: татада
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [татав, татув] 
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: татамд
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: татамда
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: татан
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: татанд
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: татанда
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: татамиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: татриʼ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: татадиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: татамиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: татамдиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: татамдиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: татаниʼ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: татандиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: татандиʼ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: татваˮ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: татраˮ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: татадоʼ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: татваˮ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: татамдаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: татамдоʼ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: татанаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: татандаˮ
     таˮ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: татандоʼ

# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: татмʼ
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: тат  
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: таˮ
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: таˮниʼ
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: татиʼ
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: такʼ
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: таˮмаˮ
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: татаˮ
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: тасˮ  
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: татамзь
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: татась 
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: таць   
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: таˮнинзь
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: татинзь
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: таканзь
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: таˮмаць 
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: татаць 
     таˮ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: тасаць  
                    
# Predicative Possessive forms 
 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: таˮам
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: таˮал
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: тата 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: таˮмиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: таˮлиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: татиʼ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: таˮмаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: таˮлаˮ
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: татоʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: такаюн  
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: такаюд  
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: такаюда 
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: такаюниʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: такаюдиʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: такаюдиʼ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: такаюнаˮ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: такаюдаˮ
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: такаюдоʼ
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тасон   
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тасод   
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тасода  
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тасониʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тасодиʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тасодиʼ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тасонаˮ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тасодаˮ 
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: тасодоʼ 
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: таˮмась
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: таˮлась
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: татась
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: таˮминзь
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: таˮлинзь
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: татинзь
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: таˮмаць
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: таˮлаць
     таˮ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: татонзь
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: такаюнась
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: такаюдась
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: такаюдась
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: такаюнинзь
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: такаюдинзь
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: такаюдинзь
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: такаюнаць
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: такаюдаць
     таˮ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: такаюдонзь
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тасонась
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тасодась
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тасодась
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тасонинзь
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тасодинзь
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тасодинзь
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тасонаць
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тасодаць
     таˮ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: тасодонзь     
